Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.051

Rule making restricted.

For rules adopted after July 27, 1997, the director of the department of labor and industries may not rely solely on a statute's statement of intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of those provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule. This section does not apply to rules adopted under chapter 39.12 RCW.

[ 1997 c 409 s 103.]

NOTES:

Part headings—1997 c 409: "Part headings used in this act do not constitute any part of the law." [ 1997 c 409 s 607.]

Severability—1997 c 409: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 409 s 609.]